Hawaii statutes.
[§386-97.5] Penalties. (a) Any
person who, after twenty-one days written notice and the opportunity to be
heard by the director, is found to have violated any provision of this chapter
or rule adopted thereunder for which no penalty is otherwise provided, shall be
fined not more than $250 for each offense.

(b) All fines collected pursuant to this
chapter shall be deposited into the special compensation fund created by
section 386-151. [L 1991, c 107, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next